Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy

11.200.
Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy — Purpose — Membership — Meetings — Chief executive officer.

There is created the Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy. The commission shall be a separate administrative body of state government within the meaning of KRS 12.010(8).

It shall be the purpose of the Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy to:

Address matters of small business as it relates to government affairs;

Promote a cooperative and constructive relationship between state agencies and the small business community to ensure coordination and implementation of statewide strategies that benefit small business in the Commonwealth;

Coordinate and educate the small business community of federal, state, and local government initiatives of value and importance to the small business community;

Create a process by which the small business community is consulted in the development of public policy as it affects their industry sector;

Aid the small business community in navigating the regulatory process, when that process becomes cumbersome, time consuming, and bewildering to the small business community; and

Advocate for the small business, as necessary when regulatory implementation is overly burdensome, costly, and harmful to the success and growth of small businesses in the Commonwealth.

The Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy shall consist of thirteen (13) members:

Two (2) members representing each congressional district; and

One (1) at-large member.

All members shall be appointed by the Governor for a term of four (4) years, except that the original appointments shall be staggered so that three (3) appointments shall expire at one (1) year, three (3) appointments shall expire at two (2) years, and three (3) appointments shall expire at three (3) years, and four (4) appointments shall expire at four (4) years from the dates of initial appointment.

The Governor shall appoint the chair and vice chair of the commission from the appointed membership.

The commission shall meet quarterly and at other times upon call of the chair or a majority of the commission.

A quorum shall be a majority of the membership of the commission.

Members of the commission shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for their necessary travel expenses actually incurred in the discharge of their duties on the commission, subject to Finance and Administration Cabinet administrative regulations.

The executive director of the Office of Entrepreneurship and Small Business Innovation shall be the administrative head and chief executive officer of the commission. The secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development shall have authority to hire staff, contract for services, expend funds, and operate the normal business activities of the commission.

The Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy shall be administratively attached to the Office of Entrepreneurship and Small Business Innovation within the Cabinet for Economic Development.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 387, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 317, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 85, § 29, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 95, § 4, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 152, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 5, effective July 15, 2010; 2014, ch. 89, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2014, ch. 92, § 20, effective January 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 37, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 185, § 96, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/1/2015). This statute was amended by 2014 Ky. Acts chs. 89 and 92. Acts ch. 92 was passed last by the General Assembly and, ordinarily, any provisions in ch. 92 which conflict with provisions in ch. 89, the earlier-passed bill, would prevail under the authority of KRS

446.250

. However, new language added in ch. 92 has not been incorporated into KRS

11.200

because to make such change would make the section unintelligible. KRS 7.136(3) provides that if a statute is amended by more than one act in the same session of the General Assembly, that the change shall be given effect and incorporated only if the change will make the section intelligible.

11.202.
Duties of Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy — Annual reports.

The duties of the Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy shall include but not be limited to:

Coordinate and promote the awareness of the Federal Small Business Regulatory Enforcement Fairness Act of 1996, and its subsequent amendments within the small business community of the Commonwealth;

Develop a process by which the small business community is made aware of state legislation and administrative regulations affecting it, both prior to its enactment and during its implementation;

Advocate for the small business sectors when state legislation and administrative regulations are overly burdensome, costly, or harmful to the success and growth of the sector;

Collect information and research those public policies and government practices which are helpful or detrimental to the success and growth of the small business community; and

Review administrative regulations that may impact small business. The commission may seek input from other agencies, organizations, or interested parties. In acting as an advocate for small business, the commission may submit a written report to the promulgating administrative body to be considered as comments received during the public comment period required by KRS 13A.270(1)(c). The report may specify the commission’s findings regarding the administrative regulation, including an identification and estimate of the number of small businesses subject to the administrative regulation, the projected reporting, recordkeeping, and other administrative costs required for compliance with the administrative regulation, and any suggestions the commission has for reducing the regulatory burden on small businesses through the use of tiering or exemptions, in accordance with KRS

13A.210

. A copy of the report shall be filed with the regulations compiler of the Legislative Research Commission.

By September 1 of each year, the commission shall submit a report to the Governor, the Interim Joint Committee on Economic Development and Workforce Investment, and the Interim Joint Committee on Tourism, Small Business, and Information Technology detailing its work in the prior fiscal year, including but not limited to the following:

Activities and achievements of the commission in accomplishing its purposes and duties;

Findings of the commission related to its collection of information and research on public policies and government practices affecting small businesses, including specific legislation and administrative regulations that are helpful or detrimental to the success of small businesses; and

Specific recommendations of ways state government could better promote the economic development efforts of small businesses in the Commonwealth.

Beginning December 1, 2012, and on every December 1 thereafter, the commission shall submit an annual report to the Secretary of State and the Legislative Research Commission setting forth an analysis of how the one-stop electronic business portal established in KRS

14.250

may be improved to make the business portal more user friendly for businesses.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 387, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 165, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2011, ch. 75, § 2, effective March 16, 2011; 2021 ch. 124, § 1, effective June 29, 2021; 2021 ch. 185, § 97, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2021). This statute was amended by 2021 Ky. Acts chs. 124 and 185, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.